District of Columbia statutes.
29A-221.28

Repealed

Parties defendant in creditor’s suit.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1321, ch. 854, § 796
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(3), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-728.
1981 Ed., § 29-428.
2001 Ed., § 29-221.28.